Maryland, session 2025, HB1067.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
1–1321.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “RETAILER” MEANS A PERSON ENGAGED IN THE
RETAIL SALE OF GOODS.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO EACH COUNTY AND MUNICIPALITY.
(C) IF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY ENACTS A LOCAL LAW THAT
AUTHORIZES OR REQUIRES A RETAILER TO CHARGE A FEE AT THE POINT OF SALE
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1067*

HOUSE BILL 1067
FOR PROVIDING A PLASTIC OR PAPER CARRYOUT BAG TO A CUSTOMER, THE
RETAILER MAY NOT CHARGE THE FEE FOR ANY TRANSACTION FOR WHICH THE
CUSTOMER MAKES A PURCHASE USING A FORM OF PAYMENT ISSUED AS PART OF:
(1) THE FEDERAL SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM; OR
(2) THE FEDERAL SPECIAL SUPPLEMENTAL FOOD PROGRAM FOR
WOMEN, INFANTS, AND CHILDREN.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.